Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.120

Bulletins and reports.

The director of agriculture may publish and distribute bulletins and reports embodying information upon the subjects of agriculture, horticulture, livestock, dairying, foods and drugs, and other matters pertaining to his or her department.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5106; 1977 c 75 s 50; 1965 c 8 s 43.23.120. Prior: (i) 1919 c 126 s 1, part; 1913 c 60 s 6, part; RRS s 2724, part. (ii) 1921 c 7 s 89, part; RRS s 10847, part.]